Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2300HH (3) 91 jm/jh H.F. 208 Section 1. Section 15.119, subsection 2, paragraph g, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 g. The workforce housing tax incentives program administered 3 pursuant to subchapter II, part 17 . In allocating tax credits 4 pursuant to this subsection , the authority shall not allocate 5 more than thirty-five million dollars for purposes of this 6 paragraph. Of the moneys allocated under this paragraph, 7 seventeen million five hundred thousand dollars shall be 8 reserved for allocation to qualified housing projects in small 9 cities, as defined in section 15.352 , that are registered on 10 or after July 1, 2017. Of the remaining moneys not allocated 11 to projects in small cities, no more than one-third of the 12 remaining moneys shall be reserved for allocation to qualified 13 housing projects located wholly in the two most populous 14 counties determined under section 15.352, subsection 10, 15 paragraph âaâ , that are registered on or after July 1, 2025. 16